Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.260

Injunctions.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court of Thurston county or of any county in which such violation occurs, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

[ 1998 c 154 s 17; 1963 c 122 s 26.]